Massachusetts, session 194th, H2582.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1: The fourth paragraph of Section 4 of Chapter 6E of the General Laws, as 
appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word 
“commonwealth” in line 45 the following-: 
“Any applicant who would otherwise be ineligible for certification or re-certification 
were it not for a presidential or gubernatorial pardon shall remain ineligible for certification or 
re-certification pursuant to this section.”